Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.261

Correcting filed record.

A limited partnership or foreign limited partnership may correct a record filed by the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.220.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6113; 2009 c 188 s 207.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.